District of Columbia statutes.
2-1341

Appropriation.

There is hereby authorized to be appropriated from the general operating budget of the District of Columbia the sum of $200,000 to carry out the purpose of this chapter. This sum does not include monies spent on existing programs for the Latino community.

Sept. 29, 1976, D.C. Law 1-86, title V, § 501, 23 DCR 2543
1981 Ed., § 1-2341.
1973 Ed., § 6-1941.